tools/mt/apertium/test/apertiumtests_mt-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/generator-mt-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/analyser-mt-gt-desc.hfstol

Tests:

# Tag tests:
  Proper nouns:
    Россия+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom : Россия

  Verbs:
    видеть+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg1 : вижу

  Participles:
    натянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins : натянутыми
    быть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins : бывшими

  Adjectives:
    современный+A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen : современных

  Pronouns:
    оно+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Nom : оно 
    он¹+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Nom : он
    она+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Nom : она

  Determiners:
    его+Det+Pos+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom : его 
